Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 2. Board of Examiners of Speech Pathology and Audiology

§ 33-33-201.
Establishment.

There is established the board of examiners of speech-language pathology and audiology.

The board shall be comprised of five (5) members appointed by the governor. Board members shall have been residents of this state for at least one (1) year immediately preceding their appointment, and shall have been engaged in rendering services to the public, teaching or research in speech-language pathology or audiology for at least five (5) years immediately preceding their appointment. At least one (1) board member shall be an audiologist, one (1) shall be a consumer, at least two (2) shall be speech-language pathologists, and the fifth member shall be a health care professional licensed pursuant to title 33 of the Wyoming statutes. All board members except the consumer and licensed health care professional shall at all times be holders of active and valid licenses and be in good standing as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist in this state. The governor may remove any board member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

Appointments shall be for three (3) year terms, with no person being eligible to serve more than two (2) full consecutive terms. Terms shall begin on the first day of the calendar year and end on the last day of the calendar year.

The board shall meet during each calendar year to select a chairman and vice chairman and for other business. At least one (1) additional meeting shall be held before the end of each calendar year. Further meetings may be convened at the call of the chairman or the written request of any three (3) board members.

Three (3) members of the board shall constitute a quorum for all purposes.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 44, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-392; Laws 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 2017 ch. 118, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a) and (b), substituted “speech-language” for “speech”; in (b), substituted “health care professional licensed pursuant to title 33 of the Wyoming statutes” for “licensed physician, surgeon or dentist”, “licensed health care professional” for “physician, surgeon or dentist” and “and be in good standing as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist” for “for the practice of speech pathology or audiology”; in (c), deleted the first sentence which formerly read: “The governor shall, within ninety (90) days following enactment of this act, appoint two (2) board members for a term of one (1) year; two (2) for a term of two (2) years; and one (1) for a term of three (3) years”, deleted “made thereafter” following “Appointments” and “except for the first appointed members, who shall serve through the last calendar day of the year in which they are appointed before commencing the terms prescribed by this subsection” in the last sentence; in (d), added “and vice chairman” after “chairman” in the first sentence; and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1975, ch. 44, § 3, makes the act effective on May 29, 1975.

§ 33-33-202.
Functions of the board.

The board may administer oaths, take affidavits, summon witnesses and take testimony as to matters coming within the scope of its duties.

The board shall adopt rules and regulations to implement and enforce the provisions of this act.

The board shall utilize an adopted seal to affix to all licenses issued in accordance with this act and to authenticate its proceedings.

The board shall administer the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact in this state as provided in W.S.

33-33-402

.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 44, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-393; 2017 ch. 118, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2020 ch. 128, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), substituted “The board may administer oaths, take affidavits, summon witnesses and take testimony as to matters coming within the scope of its duties” for “The board shall administer, coordinate and enforce the provisions of this act, evaluate the qualifications and supervise the examinations of applicants for license under this act. It may issue subpoenas, examine witnesses, administer oaths, and shall investigate allegations of practices violating the provisions of this act”; rewrote (b), which formerly read: “The board shall adopt rules and regulations relating to professional conduct, which establish ethical and professional standards of practice, and for other purposes. The board may amend or repeal the same in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act”; and added (c).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (d).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi) and notes thereto.

§ 33-33-203.
Administrative provisions.

The board may employ, and at its pleasure discharge, an executive secretary and such officers and employees as may be necessary, and shall outline their duties and fix their compensation. The amount of per diem, mileage and expense monies paid employees of the board shall be in accordance with W.S.

9-3-102

.

Copies of the proceedings, records and acts of the board, and certificates purporting to relate the facts concerning such proceedings, records and acts, signed by the chairman or the executive secretary and authenticated by the board’s seal, shall be prima facie evidence in all courts of this state.

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 118, § 2.

Under no circumstances shall the total amount of expenditures incurred by the board exceed the amount of the fees collected as provided herein.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 44, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-394; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2017 ch. 118, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” following “a separate account” in (c).

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 118, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (b), deleted the former first sentence, which read: “The board may adopt a seal by which it shall authenticate its proceedings,” and inserted “board's" preceding "seal".

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 118, § 2, deleted (c) which formerly read: “The board shall report to the state treasurer by the fifth day of each month the amount and source of all revenue received by it during the preceding month, and shall pay the entire amount thereof into a separate account. The treasurer is hereby directed to establish such an account.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 33-33-204.
Compensation of board members.

Board members shall receive no compensation for their services, but shall receive per diem and mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii).

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 44, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-395; 2014 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted “and mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii)” for “for travel expenses in accordance with W.S.

9-3-102

.”